Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3336.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [297H.075] REBATE FOR RECYCLED AND REUSED MATERIALS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Compostable materials" has the meaning given to "source-separated compostable materials" in section 115A.03, subdivision 32a, clause (3). new text end new text begin (c) "Recyclable materials" has the meaning given in section 115A.03, subdivision 25a. new text end new text begin (d) "Resource recovery facility" has the meaning given in section 115A.03, subdivision 28. new text end new text begin (e) "Waste-to-energy facility" means a facility that produces refuse-derived fuel, as defined in section 115A.03, subdivision 25d. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Reporting. new text end new text begin (a) By February 1, 2026, and each February 1 thereafter, an owner or operator of a resource recovery facility or waste-to-energy facility shall report to the commissioner of revenue, on a form prescribed by the commissioner of revenue, the following information for the previous calendar year: new text end new text begin (1) the number of tons of recyclable materials that are manually or mechanically separated from mixed municipal solid waste and that are recycled; new text end new text begin (2) the number of tons of recyclable materials that are manually or mechanically separated from mixed municipal solid waste and that are reused; new text end new text begin (3) the number of tons of compostable materials that are manually or mechanically separated from mixed municipal solid waste and that are subsequently composted or processed in an anaerobic or aerobic digester and then composted; new text end new text begin (4) the number of tons of recyclable materials that are recovered from combustor ash generated at a waste-to-energy facility and that are recycled; and new text end new text begin (5) the number of tons of combustor ash that are generated at a waste-to-energy facility and that are utilized in road construction or another approved use. new text end new text begin (b) The information in paragraph (a) must be reported separately for each clause. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Rebate calculation. new text end new text begin (a) Based on the information submitted in subdivision 2, the commissioner of revenue shall, by April 15, 2026, and each April 15 thereafter, pay a rebate from the tax paid under this chapter to each operator of a resource recovery facility or waste-to-energy facility reporting under subdivision 2 that is equal to the sum of: new text end new text begin (1) tons reported in subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (3), of materials separated from waste for which tax due under this chapter was collected, multiplied by the rate of $30; plus new text end new text begin (2) tons reported in subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clauses (4) and (5), of materials separated from waste for which tax due under this chapter was collected, multiplied by the rate of $20. new text end new text begin (b) The amount necessary to pay each operator of a resource recovery facility or waste-to-energy facility under this section is appropriated to the commissioner of revenue from the revenues allocated pursuant to section 297H.13, subdivision 2, paragraph (a). new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297H.13, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Allocation of revenues. (a) Of the amounts remitted under this chapterdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin :new text end new text begin (1) the amount necessary to pay rebates under section 297H.075 is appropriated to the commissioner to issue rebates; and new text end new text begin (2)new text end 70 percentnew text begin of the remaining amountnew text end must be credited to the environmental fund established in section 16A.531, subdivision 1. (b) In addition to the amounts new text begin appropriated for rebates and new text end credited to the environmental fund in paragraph (a), in fiscal year 2024 and later, three percent of the amounts remitted under this chapter shall be deposited into the resource management account in the environmental fund. (c) The remainder must be deposited into the general fund. (d) Beginning in fiscal year 2024 and annually thereafter, the money deposited in the resource management account in the environmental fund under paragraph (b) is appropriated to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency for distribution to counties under section 115A.557, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (7) and (9) to (11). new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end